District of Columbia statutes.
16-915

Change of name on divorce.

Upon divorce from the bond of marriage, the court shall, on request of a party who assumed a new name on marriage and desires to discontinue using it, state in the decree of divorce either the birth-given or other previous name which such person desires to use.

Dec. 23, 1963, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1, 77 Stat. 562
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 18, 23 DCR 2544
1981 Ed., § 16-915.
1973 Ed., § 16-915.